California, session 20252026, SB920.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 19841.5 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:19841.5. (a) Upon the adoption or adjustment of a fee that is deposited into the Gambling Control Fund, the commission or the department shall do both of the following:(1) Adopt and maintain a regulation that states the authorized purpose and use of the fee, including the program activities funded and the categories of costs covered, including any shared administrative or support costs. The cost allocation methodology may be incorporated by reference to materials in the rulemaking record.(2) Post on its public internet website the purpose and use statement and a brief cost basis summary related to that fee.(b) A fee or adjustment to a fee shall not take effect until the regulation required by this section is adopted or amended.(c)Except as otherwise authorized by statute and identified by regulation, fees established for licensing activities shall not be used to fund nonlicensing activities.(d)Except as otherwise authorized by statute and identified by regulation, revenues from a fee subject to this section shall be expended only for the activities and purposes stated for that fee in the applicable regulation adopted pursuant to this section. (e)(c) This section does not apply to any fee adopted or amended prior to the effective date of the act that added this section.